Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-1643
Advisory committee; appointment, when; compensation; expenses.

(1) Upon passing the resolution described in section 39-1639 that creates a district in which special assessments will be levied, the board shall appoint an advisory committee of not less than three persons residing in the district to advise with the board on all matters affecting the road improvement in the district, financing the cost of the road improvement, and the levy of special assessments.

(2) The board may from time to time replace any person who resigns or refuses to act or appoint additional members to the advisory committee.

(3) The members of the committees shall receive no compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for expenses incurred by them in performing their duties, with reimbursement for mileage to be computed at the rate provided in section 81-1176, and the amount of such reimbursement shall be included in the cost of the improvement.

Laws 1963, c. 213, § 6, p. 681;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 60;

Laws 1996, LB 1011, § 24;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 55.
July 18, 2026